Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.230

Procedure on appeal—Transcript.

Within ten days from the filing of the notice of appeal, the appellant shall file with the clerk of the superior court a transcript consisting of the assessment roll and his or her objections thereto, together with the ordinance confirming the assessment roll and the record of the council with reference to the assessment. This transcript, upon payment of the necessary fees therefor, shall be furnished by the city or town clerk and shall be certified by him or her to contain full, true and correct copies of all matters and proceedings required to be included in the transcript. The fees payable therefor shall be the same as those payable to the clerk of the superior court for the preparation and certification of transcripts on appeal to the supreme court or the court of appeals in civil actions.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2079; 1971 c 81 s 90; 1965 c 7 s 35.44.230. Prior: 1957 c 143 s 5; prior: 1911 c 98 s 22, part; RRS s 9374, part.]